tables/da-dk-g26-patches.cti
# Liblouis: Danish, patches for 6 dots grade 2
#
#  Copyright (C) 2014, Bue Vester-Andersen <bue@vester-andersen.dk>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#------------
#
# This file contains work-arounds for several bugs in the Liblouis code.
# It will be revised when the bugs are fixed.
#
# Version: Bue Vester-Andersen, 140511

# *** patches for various Liblouis bugs
# To be will be removed when the bugs are fixed

# Apparently, when a none-digit combination, e.g. 1246, is placed between a numsign and letters a-j, then numsign and the none-digit char is swapped during back-translation and a number is created. This behaviour seems to be hard-coded into liblouis and can be recreated in en-us-g2.ctb, e.g. $#di vs. #$di.

nofor always vene 3456-1246
nofor always vege 3456-12456

# currently, the uplow opcode can not be used in the Danish tables, because then there is no way to keep
# Liblouis from contracting capped words in 6 dots
# However, without uplow, Liblouis can't recognize all caps in back-translation.
# Therefore we have to specify some much used all caps abreviations.

nofor always ABC 456-1-12-14
nofor always AC 456-1-14
nofor always ADSL 456-1-145-234-123
nofor always AF 456-1-124
nofor always ASCII 456-1-234-14-24-24
nofor always BCC 456-12-14-14
nofor always BSI 456-12-234-24
nofor always BSIEU 456-12-234-24-15-136
nofor always BSU 456-12-234-136
nofor always CC 456-14-14
 nofor always CD 456-14-145
nofor always CE 456-14-15
nofor always  CO 456-14-135
nofor always  COM 456-14-135-134
nofor always CSV 456-14-234-1236
nofor always CV 456-14-1236
nofor always DAISY 456-145-1-24-234-13456
nofor always DBB 456-145-12-12
nofor always DBS 456-145-12-234
nofor always DBSU 456-145-12-234-136
nofor always DC 456-145-14
nofor always DF 456-145-124
nofor always DK 456-145-13
nofor always DM 456-145-134
nofor always DSB 456-145-234-12
nofor always DSU 456-145-234-136
nofor always DUN 456-145-136-1345
nofor always EDGE 456-15-145-1245-15
nofor always EM 456-15-134
nofor always EML 456-15-134-123
nofor always EU 456-15-136
nofor always FCC 456-124-14-14
nofor always FM 456-124-134
nofor always FN 456-124-1345
nofor always  FTP 456-124-2345-1234
nofor always GB 456-1245-12
nofor always GHz 456-1245-125-1356
nofor always GPS 456-1245-1234-234
nofor always HBO 456-125-12-135
nofor always HF 456-125-124
nofor always HH 456-125-125
nofor always HHX 456-125-125-1346
nofor always HIMS 456-125-24-134-234
nofor always HTML 456-125-2345-134-123
nofor always II 456-24-24
nofor always III 456-24-24-24
nofor always IMAP 456-24-134-1-1234
nofor always IQ 456-24-12345
nofor always IOS 456-24-135-234
nofor always IP 456-24-1234
nofor always IV 456-24-1236
nofor always IX 456-24-1346
nofor always JAWS 456-245-1-2456-234
nofor always KAbB 456-13-1-12-12
nofor always KU 456-13-136
nofor always LAF 456-123-1-124
nofor always LAN 456-123-1-1345
nofor always LCD 456-123-14-145
nofor always MAC 456-134-1-14
nofor always MB 456-134-12
nofor always MHz 456-134-125-1356
nofor always MI 456-134-24
nofor always NGO 456-1345-1245-135
nofor always NN 456-1345-1345
nofor always NOTA 456-135-2345-1
nofor always NVDA 456-1345-1236-145-1
nofor always OK 456-135-13
nofor always OPML 456-135-1234-134-123
nofor always OS 456-135-234
nofor always OTG 456-135-2345-1245
nofor always PC 456-1234-14
nofor always PDA 456-1234-145-1
nofor always POP 456-1234-135-1234
nofor always PSK 456-1234-234-13
nofor always RAM 456-1235-1-134
nofor always RF 456-1235-124
nofor always RFC 456-1235-124-14
nofor always ROM 456-1235-135-134
nofor always RSS 456-1235-234-234
nofor always RTF 456-1235-2345-124
nofor always SD 456-234-145
nofor always SF 456-234-124
nofor always SMTP 456-234-134-2345-1234
nofor always SRF 456-234-1235-124
nofor always SSD 456-234-234-145
nofor always TV 456-2345-1236
nofor always URL 456-136-1235-123
nofor always US 456-136-234
nofor always USA 456-136-234-1
nofor always USB 456-136-234-12
nofor always VGA 456-1236-1245-1
nofor always VI 456-1236-24
nofor always VII 456-1236-24-24
nofor always VIII 456-1236-24-24-24
nofor always VK 456-1236-13
nofor always VM 456-1236-134
nofor always VU 456-1236-136
nofor always W 456-2456
nofor always WA 456-2456-1
nofor always WEP 456-2456-15-1234
nofor always  WHO 456-2456-125-135
nofor always  WLAN 456-2456-123-1-1345
nofor always WPA 456-2456-1234-1
nofor always XI 456-1346-24
nofor always XP 456-1346-1234

nofor endnum er 6-156
nofor always s 6-234
